nouns.lexd
аагъу[IV]
абадвалды[III]
абадур[III]
абазин[I/II]
абалтый[III]
абалхуй[III]
абитуриент[I]
аблагь[I]
абыгардан[III]
абый[I]
абыкавсар[III]
абыр[III]
абырлывалды[III]
абырсызвалды[III]
аваданвалды[III]
аваз[IV]
аваза[III]
авалды[III]
аванс[III]
авар[I]
аварие[III]
август[III]
авиацие[III]
автобиографие[III]
автобус[III]
автомат[III]
автомобил[III]
автаномие[III]
автор[I]
авторитет[IV]
авторучка[III]
авчи[I]
агент[I]
агентвалды[III]
агитатур[I]
агитатурвалды[III]
агитацие[III]
агитпункт[IV]
агранум[I/II]
агранумвалды[III]
агыд[IV]
агъ[IV]
агъа[I]
агъавалды[III]
агъдабан[IV]
агъмаргъал[III]
агъмишвалды[III]
агърадкьый[IV]
агъсакъал[I]
агъул[I]
агъыл[IV]
агъырвалды[III]
агь[III]
агьали[I]
агьизар[III]
агьил[III]
адабадавалды[III]
адар[III]
адахлы[I/II]
адвокат[I/II]
адмирал[I]
адрес[III]
адыгей[I]
аджар[I]
аджыгъ[III]
аджыткый[III]
адзукьуй[III]
адишвалды[III]
администрацие[III]
аждаамый[III]
аждагь[III]
аждагьвалды[III]
азадвалды[III]
азан[IV]
азгъунвалды[III]
азербайджан[III]
азнывыр[I]
айван[IV]
айгъыр[III]
айран[III]
айрылмишвалды[III]
академик[I]
академие[III]
акт[IV]
актив[III]
активист[I]
активиствалды[III]
акция[III]
акула[III]
акьраб[IV]
акIуд[III]
алабаш[III]
алагуьзли[II]
алакьа[III]
алакьасызвалды[III]
албан[I]
албасти[III]
алвер[III]
алверчи[I/II]
алгебра[III]
алгъый[III]
алебастер[IV]
аллагь[I]
алмас[IV]
алтым[IV]
алух[IV]
алфавит[IV]
алхыш[IV]
алчах[I]
алчахвалды[III]
альбом[IV]
аман[III]
аманат[III]
аманминнет[III]
амбулаторие[III]
амин[III]
амыр[III]
анархия[III]
анатомия[IV]
анди[I]
андишура[I]
анкета[III]
ансамбль[III]
антенна[III]
антология[III]
аппарат[III]
апрель[III]
апсын[IV]
апсынвалды[III]
аптек[III]
ара[III]
араб[III]
аракесма[IV]
аракIаш[I/II]
аракIашвалды[III]
аралых[IV]
аран[III]
арасур[IV]
аратур[I]
аратурвалды[III]
аренда[III]
арендатур[I/II]
арзуман[IV]
арифметика[IV]
армие[III]
артель[III]
артиллерие[IV]
артист[I]
артиствалды[III]
артистка[II]
артмишвалды[III]
артухвалды[III]
арудкIунвалды[III]
арх[III]
арха[IV]
архадж[IV]
архалух[IV]
архыйинбег[I]
архыйинвалды[III]
архъвдархъв[III]
арчи[I]
аршинвалды[III]
асар[III]
асарсызвалды[III]
асиде[III]
аспирант[III]
аспирантвалды[III]
аспирантура[III]
астар[IV]
асый[IV]
асыл[III]
асыллывалды[III]
асынвалды[III]
атабаба[I]
аттестат[III]
атIлас[IV]
аудиторие[III]
аферин[III]
афган[I]
афиша[III]
африка[III]
ахад[IV]
ахвахдишура[I]
ахмакьвалды[III]
ахтарма[III]
ахун[I]
ахъ[IV]
ачар[IV]
ачче[III]
ачыхвалды[III]
аш[IV]
ашкаравалды[III]
ашурма[III]
аяз[IV]
аяз[IV]
аят[IV]
аъсур[III]
аьвдул[II]
аькваьл[IV]
аьмкваьлий[III]
аIкьуIрвалды[III]
аIкIдаIкI[IV]
аIрх[IV]
аIхъ[III]
аIхъаIн[III]
аIхIсан[III]
аIхIвал[III]
аIхIвалат[III]
аIхIтиетвалды[III]
аIхIтиетсызвалды[III]
аIъ[III]
аIъ[III]
аIълал[III]
баба[I]
бабасил[III]
бабатвалды[III]
бабацый[I]
бабаьй[II]
багурвалды[III]
багъ[IV]
багъ[IV]
багълама[III]
багъманчи[I]
багъманчивалды[III]
багъышлемиш[IV]
багь[III]
багьавалды[III]
багьана[III]
багьар[III]
багьачи[I]
багьвалды[III]
бадахъ[I]
баду[III]
бадучи[I]
бадымджан[III]
баджанахъ[I]
баджанахъвалды[III]
баджарах[IV]
баджарахлывалды[III]
баджарахсызвалды[III]
базар[III]
базарчи[I]
базибенд[IV]
базирген[I]
базу[III]
бак[IV]
бак[IV]
бакаравалды[III]
бакмаз[III]
бактерие[III]
бакьакьый[III]
бакьукь[III]
бала[I]
балабан[I]
балабанчи[I]
балабанчивалды[III]
балавалды[III]
балбаз[III]
балгъар[IV]
балинце[III]
балкар[I]
балет[IV]
балта[IV]
балугъ[III]
балугъчи[I]
балун[IV]
бамбаз[IV]
банда[III]
бандит[I]
бандитвалды[III]
банкI[IV]
банкIа[IV]
банкет[III]
банкъурут[IV]
банкъурутвалды[III]
баный[IV]
бапый[IV]
бар[IV]
бара[IV]
барабарвалды[III]
барабарсызвалды[III]
баравалды[III]
барак[IV]
барак[IV]
барбына[IV]
баргъаIл[I]
баргъаIлвалды[III]
баргъумвалды[III]
баргъумый[I/II]
бардагъ[III]
бармак[III]
барометр[IV]
бартер[IV]
бартIал[IV]
барут[III]
бархум[IV]
барчи[III]
барый[III]
барышыхвалды[III]
бас[III]
басабас[III]
басалух[IV]
батальон[IV]
батарее[IV]
батист[IV]
батман[III]
батI[IV]
батIилвалды[III]
бахт[III]
бахтлывалды[III]
бахтыварвалды[III]
бахтыкъара[I/II]
бахче[IV]
бахыер[III]
бацан[I]
бацIби[I]
бацIи[III]
башкир[I/II]
башлых[IV]
баьвыIл[IV]
баьвыIш[IV]
баьгь[IV]
баьл[III]
баьл[III]
баьлкьул[III]
баьли[III]
баьмбаьк[IV]
баьнаьвыш[IV]
баьнаьний[IV]
баIгь[IV]
баIхIс[IV]
баIъ[IV]
баIъ[III]
баIъаIъыIй[III]
баям[IV]
бебий[IV]
бег[I]
бег[III]
бегвалды[III]
бегедевалды[III]
бегемишвалды[III]
бегихъый[III]
бегьемвалды[III]
бегьемсызвалды[III]
бегьер[III]
бегьерлывалды[III]
бегьерсызвалды[III]
беден[IV]
бедназар[I]
бедри[IV]
беж[IV]
беземишвалды[III]
беззет[I]
бейабырчи[I]
бейабырчивалды[III]
бейбахтвалды[III]
бейбыт[IV]
бейхIаIлвалды[III]
бейкефвалды[III]
бейкъуш[II]
бейниван[I]
бейхабарвалды[III]
бекI[IV]
белавалды[III]
белби[IV]
белзин[IV]
беларус[I/II]
бенд[IV]
бенд[IV]
бенде[I/II]
бензи[IV]
бер[III]
бербадвалды[III]
бере[III]
березент[IV]
берекет[III]
берекетсызвалды[III]
бетервалды[III]
бехилвалды[III]
бешачалан[III]
библиотека[III]
бизарвалды[III]
бизма[III]
бикIервалды[III]
билбил[III]
билет[IV]
билиг[III]
билма[IV]
бин[III]
бинкьул[III]
биндигурвалды[III]
биология[IV]
биргада[III]
биргадир[I]
биргадирвалды[III]
бирданвалды[III]
биркв[III]
бирлиант[IV]
бирчек[III]
бисмиллагь[III]
битаввалды[III]
битIимвалды[III]
бихь[IV]
бихьидтIили[III]
бицI[IV]
бицI[III]
бицIав[III]
бич[I]
биче[II]
бичил[IV]
бичилехыли[IV]
букси[III]
боксёр[I]
болгар[I]
болт[IV]
большевик[I]
большевиквалды[III]
бумба[III]
борш[III]
ботаника[IV]
бронемашин[III]
бронь[IV]
броня[III]
брошюра[IV]
бугъ[III]
бугъа[III]
бугъаз[III]
бугъазадтIур[III]
бугъацый[I/II]
бугъма[IV]
бугъмишвалды[III]
бугъум[IV]
бугь[III]
будух[I]
буза[IV]
буйругъ[IV]
буйругъчи[I/II]
буйругъчивалды[III]
букь[I/II]
букI[IV]
бульвар[IV]
бургъу[IV]
буржуазие[III]
буругъ[III]
буругъчи[I/II]
буругъчивалды[III]
бурят[I/II]
буфет[III]
буфетчик[I/II]
буфетчиквалды[III]
бухалтир[I/II]
бухалтерие[III]
бухалтирвалды[III]
бухари[IV]
буIгъаIл[IV]
буIгьуI[III]
быдагъ[IV]
быз[IV]
бызхана[III]
бый[IV]
быйбухах[IV]
былама[III]
былах[III]
былбыллыхвалды[nan]
былвалды[III]
бына[III]
бырдж[IV]
бырджахъан[I/II]
бырджлы[I/II]
бырджлывалды[III]
быстан[IV]
бытIравалды[III]
бычI[IV]
бышвалды[III]
бышевалды[III]
бышкIа[III]
быIркь[I/II]
быIркьаIвалды[III]
бюджет[III]
бюллетен[III]
бюро[III]
ваба[IV]
ваганчи[III]
вагзал[IV]
вагун[III]
вагуб[III]
ваз[III]
ваза[IV]
вазир[I]
вазирвалды[III]
вазна[IV]
вайвай[III]
вайис[I/II]
вайисвалды[III]
вайхыр[III]
вакъалый[III]
валает[III]
вальс[IV]
валыг[IV]
валюта[III]
ванилин[III]
ванна[III]
варвар[I/II]
варвар[III]
варварвалды[III]
вараIхъ[III]
варгьам[IV]
варис[I/II]
варисмирас[I/II]
варлывалды[III]
варцах[III]
васи[III]
васиет[III]
васла[III]
вастани[III]
ватан[III]
ватандаш[I]
ватт[III]
ватин[IV]
вафа[III]
вафалывалды[III]
вафасызвалды[III]
вах[III]
ваханни[IV]
вахт[III]
вахта[III]
вахчег[IV]
вачак[III]
ваIгь[III]
ваIгьде[III]
ваIгьза[III]
ваIхIшивалды[III]
ваIхваIркый[III]
веджесывалды[III]
веджине[III]
веджинесызвалды[III]
везелин[III]
везеревыгIыргIый[III]
везиет[III]
везифе[III]
векил[I/II]
векилвалды[III]
векIегьвалды[nan]
велвеле[III]
велед[III]
веледсызвалды[III]
велисебет[III]
верги[III]
вергюл[IV]
вердишвалды[III]
вермишел[IV]
вет[III]
вешентIий[I/II]
виждан[III]
виждансызвалды[III]
вик[IV]
викъин[III]
винт[III]
винтуфка[III]
виргъиднин[III]
вирд[III]
виригъ[III]
вирус[III]
витамин[III]
вихь[IV]
военком[I]
военкомат[III]
вожатый[I/II]
вугъуIргъаIуб[III]
выговор[III]
выгын[III]
выгьыр[III]
выгIыл[I]
выгIылдывалды[III]
вызыр[III]
выписка[III]
выргьай[III]
выргьавыр[III]
вырра[III]
вырыIкь[III]
вырытI[III]
вырыхъ[III]
выс[IV]
выставка[III]
высын[III]
выт[III]
вытIвытIый[I/II]
выш[IV]
га[IV]
гаавыр[I]
габарч[IV]
габинет[III]
габинкIа[IV]
гавань[III]
гавырат[III]
гаг[I]
гагурт[IV]
гагьгир[IV]
гагьгирий[I]
гада[I]
гадавалды[III]
гадагуди[I]
гадар[III]
гадачи[II]
гадачивалды[III]
гадыхъый[I]
гадзый[III]
газ[IV]
гайка[III]
галаг[IV]
галлагьвалды[III]
галстук[IV]
галыш[IV]
гамма[III]
ганаб[III]
ганабый[III]
гандз[III]
ганкьуIлий[III]
гантур[III]
гап[III]
гар[IV]
гарадж[IV]
гарантие[III]
гардан[III]
гардж[IV]
гардж[IV]
гардж[IV]
гарзинкIа[III]
гармун[III]
гарыват[III]
гарый[I/II]
гастроном[III]
гастинце[III]
гастум[III]
гатIи[III]
гатIый[IV]
гаф[III]
гацал[IV]
гаьбаьнч[IV]
гаьваьли[III]
гаьвгаьвый[III]
гаьнин[II]
гаьнинвалды[III]
гаьри[IV]
гаьт[III]
гаьт[III]
гаIш[III]
гаIшвалды[III]
гаIшетыла[IV]
гаIши[III]
гаIшмыкь[III]
гвабахъ[IV]
гвад[III]
гвададый[III]
гвал[III]
гвалах[III]
гван[III]
гван[III]
гванахъый[III]
гварг[III]
гварг[III]
гвардие[III]
гваьчIий[IV]
гедгыд[III]
гедишат[IV]
геевер[III]
гел[III]
геледжах[III]
гелелий[III]
гелерхъан[I/II]
гелерхъанвалды[III]
гелхын[IV]
геми[III]
гемичи[I/II]
генгвалды[III]
гендже[III]
генджемынари[IV]
генерал[I/II]
географие[III]
геометрие[III]
гервенге[IV]
гереквалды[III]
герексызвалды[nan]
герой[I/II]
геройвалды[III]
герчеквалды[III]
гибуг[III]
гигиена[III]
гиджичIинвалды[III]
гидростанцие[IV]
гидротехник[I]
гийкьынвалды[III]
гийхьинвалды[III]
гилдыукь[IV]
гилий[III]
гилза[III]
гилидур[IV]
гим[III]
гимн[IV]
гимназие[III]
гипноз[IV]
гипси[IV]
гирамиг[I/II]
гирамигвалды[III]
гирва[IV]
гицинвалды[III]
гичI[III]
гичIинвалды[III]
глагол[III]
глобус[III]
гол[III]
горчица[III]
госпитал[III]
градус[III]
градусник[III]
граматсызвалды[III]
грамм[III]
грамматика[IV]
грамата[III]
граната[IV]
графин[III]
грек[I/II]
грип[IV]
гуруппа[III]
гуг[III]
гуг[III]
гуг[III]
гуг[III]
гугалый[III]
гугуй[IV]
гугьулвалды[III]
гудж[III]
гуджливалды[III]
гузунвалды[III]
гуй[III]
гукунвалды[III]
гул[IV]
гулилий[III]
гулый[I/II]
гумба[III]
гумп[III]
гумрахIвалды[III]
гунаа[III]
гунаабынаа[III]
гунаакар[I/II]
гундз[III]
гуп[III]
гупаный[I/II]
гупур[IV]
гурвалды[III]
гурушкIа[IV]
гуршил[IV]
гутI[III]
гутIый[I/II]
гушаг[IV]
гушунвалды[III]
гуямишвалды[III]
гуьгьуьл[IV]
гуьгьуьлли[I]
гуьгьуьлливалды[III]
гуьзбагълыен[I]
гуьзги[IV]
гуьзел[II]
гуьзелвалды[III]
гуьзлик[IV]
гуьл[III]
гуьл[IV]
гуьлгез[III]
гуьлег[IV]
гуьлег[IV]
гуьлле[III]
гуьлменди[III]
гуьмбез[III]
гуьней[IV]
гуьний[IV]
гуьрчеквалды[III]
гыблибычI[IV]
гыблийыхIын[IV]
гыблихьед[IV]
гыбыл[IV]
гыбытIый[III]
гываъан[IV]
гыгый[I]
гыдзыр[I]
гыл[IV]
гыладкьваIр[III]
гылыдж[IV]
гылый[I]
гылыш[III]
гымре[III]
гымыш[IV]
гыр[III]
гыргыр[III]
гыргыр[III]
гырдым[IV]
гырц[IV]
гырыцI[IV]
гытI[IV]
гыцый[I/II]
гыцI[IV]
гыIх[IV]
гъавалды[III]
гъавыр[III]
гъавырсызвалды[III]
гъаднагъадишды[III]
гъаджир[III]
гъадургунвалды[III]
гъайривалды[I]
гъалатI[IV]
гъалибвалды[III]
гъамивалды[III]
гъариб[I/II]
гъарибывалды[III]
гъахьун[IV]
гъахьунгъара[IV]
гъаI[III]
гъаI[III]
гъаIл[III]
гъаIнаIрхъаIн[I/II]
гъаIнаIх[IV]
гъаIнвалды[III]
гъаIраIбгъаIний[III]
гъаIргъаIр[III]
гъваб[III]
гъваргъвапIый[III]
гъеблинвалды[III]
гъечIирхьынвалды[III]
гъигъвалды[III]
гъигъвалды[III]
гъил[III]
гъилигъ[III]
гъирйат[IV]
гъирйатсызвалды[III]
гъубагъ[III]
гъугъ[III]
гъулгъула[III]
гъур[IV]
гъурбат[III]
гъуругъуй[III]
гъургъуруш[IV]
гъуIд[III]
гъуIд[III]
гъуIдиген[III]
гъуIдиген[III]
гъуIдидий[III]
гъуIдихдад[IV]
гъуIл[IV]
гъуIн[IV]
гъыгъ[III]
гъыд[III]
гъыдгъырвалды[III]
гъыл[III]
гъылыгъ[III]
гъыргъыр[III]
гъырчI[III]
гъыIб[III]
гъыIбаIкьырт[III]
гъыIбаIтIул[III]
гъыIбри[III]
гъыIбриш[III]
гъыIдилвалды[III]
гъыIдыIгъ[III]
гъыIлд[IV]
гъыIр[III]
гъыIрвалды[III]
гъыIрешепIапIый[III]
гъыIргъаIвалды[III]
гъыIргъыIр[III]
гъыIрий[III]
гъыIрлыIрхъ[I/II]
гъыIрч[III]
гъыIрчехъан[I/II]
гъыIрчехъанвалды[III]
гьаваа[III]
гьаваа[III]
гьаваа[III]
гьагвадгьаджагвад[IV]
гьагудгьаджагуд[IV]
гьагъун[IV]
гьадхынвалды[III]
гьайгьай[III]
гьайгьуй[III]
гьакь[IV]
гьакь[IV]
гьакьал[III]
гьакьаллывалды[III]
гьакьалсызвалды[III]
гьакьвалды[III]
гьакьхIасаб[IV]
гьалый[III]
гьамг[IV]
гьамг[IV]
гьамкьыл[III]
гьамц[III]
гьарай[III]
гьарый[III]
гьархв[IV]
гьархуй[I/II]
гьарч[IV]
гьарчехъый[I/II]
гьарый[III]
гьах[III]
гьахур[III]
гьацIал[III]
гьачий[III]
гьаънамаъ[I/II]
гьаьгь[IV]
гьаьгь[IV]
гьаьдаьгь[III]
гьайаьг[III]
гьаькуй[IV]
гьаьл[IV]
гьаьл[IV]
гьаьл[IV]
гьаьний[IV]
гьаIаIлим[I/II]
гьаIаIлимвалды[III]
гьаIбеси[III]
гьаIв[III]
гьаIвамвалды[III]
гьаIвгьаIвый[III]
гьаIдат[IV]
гьаIджаIгьаIйибвалды[III]
гьаIджизвалды[III]
гьаIзаб[III]
гьаIзабали[I/II]
гьаIзабгьаIзиет[III]
